Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2,248
Itinerant food vendor, defined.

Itinerant food vendor shall mean a person that sells prepackaged, time/temperature control for safety food from an approved source at a nonpermanent location such as a farmers market, craft show, or county fair.

Laws 2007, LB74, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 5.